Illinois, session 104th, SB2099.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act is 5amended by adding Section 10.5 and by changing Section 12 as 6follows: 7    (225 ILCS 5/10.5 new)8    Sec. 10.5. Notice of expiring license. The Department 9shall notify an athletic trainer at least 30 days before the 10expiration of his or her license that if he or she does not 11place the license into inactive status, he or she will be 12subject to the required fees to restore the license once it has 13expired. 14    (225 ILCS 5/12)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7612)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)16    Sec. 12. Restoration of expired licenses. An athletic 17trainer who has permitted his or her license to expire or who 18has had his or her license on inactive status may have his or 19her license restored by making application to the Department 20and filing proof acceptable to the Department of his or her 21fitness to have his or her license restored, and by paying the 22required fees. If an athletic trainer's license has been   SB2099- 2 -LRB104 03065 AAS 13083 b1expired for no longer than 5 years, the athletic trainer was 2practicing in another jurisdiction during the period of 3expiration, and the athletic trainer furnishes to the 4Department an affidavit to that effect, then the Department 5shall waive any restoration fee or lapsed renewal fee for 6restoration of that license. Proof of fitness may include 7sworn evidence certifying active lawful practice in another 8jurisdiction. 9    If the athletic trainer has not maintained an active 10practice in another jurisdiction satisfactory to the 11Department, the Department shall determine, by an evaluation 12program established by rule, his or her fitness for 13restoration of the license and shall establish procedures and 14requirements for restoration.15    Any athletic trainer whose license has been expired for 16more than 5 years may have his or her license restored by 17making application to the Department and filing proof 18acceptable to the Department of his or her fitness to have his 19or her license restored, including sworn evidence certifying 20to active practice in another jurisdiction and by paying the 21required restoration fee. However, any athletic trainer whose 22license has expired while he or she has been engaged (1) in the 23federal service in active duty with the Army of the United 24States, the United States Navy, the Marine Corps, the Air 25Force, the Coast Guard, or the State Militia called into the 26service or training of the United States of America, or (2) in   SB2099- 3 -LRB104 03065 AAS 13083 b1training or education under the supervision of the United 2States preliminary to induction into the military service, may 3have his or her license restored without paying any lapsed 4renewal fees or restoration fee, if within 2 years after 5termination of such service, training, or education, other 6than by dishonorable discharge, he or she furnished the 7Department with an affidavit to the effect that he or she has 8been so engaged and that his or her service, training, or 9education has been so terminated.10(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.)